Washington statutes.
RCW 36.08.080

Expense of proceedings.

The expense of the proceedings and election provided for in this chapter shall be paid by the county to which the territory is attached.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.08.080. Prior: 1891 c 144 s 8; RRS s 3979.]